Nevada, session 83, SB395.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482A.070 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482A.070 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2,]
this section, if an autonomous vehicle is being tested or operated on
a highway within this State, a human operator must be:
(a) Seated in a position which allows the human operator to take
immediate manual control of the autonomous vehicle; and
(b) Capable of taking over immediate manual control of the
autonomous vehicle in the event of a failure of the automated
driving system or other emergency.
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or 4, a
fully autonomous vehicle may be tested or operated on a highway
within this State with the automated driving system engaged and
without a human operator being present within the fully autonomous
vehicle if the fully autonomous vehicle satisfies the requirements of
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 482A.080.
3. An autonomous vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating
or gross combined vehicle weight rating in excess of 26,000
pounds shall not be tested or operated on a highway within this
State unless a human operator who holds a commercial driver’s
license issued pursuant to NRS 483.900 to 483.940, inclusive, and
who is trained in operating and shutting off the vehicle is:
(a) Seated in a position which allows the human operator to
take immediate manual control of the autonomous vehicle; and
(b) Capable of taking over immediate manual control of the
autonomous vehicle in the event of a failure of the automated
driving system or other emergency.
4. An autonomous vehicle that has more than two axles and
that is capable of transporting 8 or more passengers shall not be
tested or operated on a highway within this State unless a human
operator who holds a commercial driver’s license issued pursuant
to NRS 483.900 to 483.940, inclusive, and who is trained in
operating and shutting off the vehicle is:
-
*SB395*

– 3 –
(a) Seated in a position which allows the human operator to
take immediate manual control of the autonomous vehicle; and
(b) Capable of taking over immediate manual control of the
autonomous vehicle in the event of a failure of the automated
driving system or other emergency.
5. A human operator described in subsection 3 or 4 shall
meet all federal and state qualifications for the type of vehicle
being operated, whether in automated mode or nonautomated
mode.
Sec. 2. 1. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval for the purpose of adopting regulations and performing any
other preparatory administrative tasks, and on October 1, 2025, for
all other purposes.
2. This act expires by limitation on September 30, 2035.
H
-
*SB395*